Utah statutes.
9-1-809.   Commission duties.
(1)  The commission shall, in the performance of its tasks and functions:
(a)  ensure that its funding decisions meet all federal and state statutory
requirements;
(b)  recommend innovative, creative, statewide service programs to increase
volunteer participation in all age groups and community-based problem-solving
among diverse participants;
(c)  develop and implement a centralized, organized system of obtaining
information and technical support concerning volunteerism and community
service recruitment, projects, training methods, materials, and activities
throughout the state and share the information and support upon request;
(d)  promote strong interagency collaboration as an avenue for maximizing
resources and providing that model on the state level;
(e)  provide public recognition and support of individual volunteer efforts
and successful or promising private sector initiatives and public/private
partnerships that address community needs;
(f)  stimulate increased community awareness of the impact of volunteer
services in the state;
(g)  utilize local, state, and, subject to Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds
Procedures Act, federal resources to reinforce, expand, and initiate quality
service programs;
(h)  assist in the planning and implementation of volunteer programs;
(i)  serve as the state's liaison and voice to appropriate national and state
organizations that support its mission;
(j)  develop a three-year comprehensive state and community service plan and
establish state priorities;
(k)  preselect programs and prepare applications to the corporation pursuant
to the act;
(l)  administer the grants program and oversee and monitor the performance and
progress of funded programs;
(m)  implement comprehensive, nonduplicative evaluation and monitoring
systems;
(n)  provide technical assistance to local nonprofit organizations and other
entities;
(o)  assist in the development of programs established in the act;
(p)  develop mechanisms for recruitment and placement of people interested in
participating in national service programs;
(q)  assist in the provision of health care and child care benefits to
participants under the act;
(r)  make priority program recommendations to the corporation;
(s)  coordinate its activities with the activities of other state agencies
that administer federal block grants; and
(t)  coordinate its activities with the activities of other volunteer service
programs.
(2)  The commission may not directly operate or run a national service program
receiving financial assistance, in any form, from the corporation.
(3) (a)  The commission may, subject to Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds
Procedures Act, receive and accept federal funds, and may receive and accept
private gifts, donations, or funds from any source.
(b)  All money shall be deposited with the state and shall be continuously
available to the commission to carry out the purposes of this part.

